Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2220
Proper credentialing required; violation of act; cease and desist order.

(1) Except as provided in section 76-2221, it shall be unlawful for anyone to act as a real property appraiser in this state without first obtaining proper credentialing as required under the Real Property Appraiser Act.

(2) Except as provided in section 76-2221, any person who, directly or indirectly for another, offers, attempts, agrees to engage, or engages in real property appraisal practice, or who advertises or holds himself or herself out to the general public as a real property appraiser, shall be deemed a real property appraiser within the meaning of the Real Property Appraiser Act, and such action shall constitute sufficient contact with this state for the exercise of personal jurisdiction over such person in any action arising out of such act. Committing a single act described in this section by a person required to be credentialed under the Real Property Appraiser Act and not so credentialed shall constitute a violation of the act for which the board may impose sanctions pursuant to this section for the protection of the public health, safety, or welfare.

(3) The board may issue a cease and desist order against any person who violates this section. Such order shall be final ten days after issuance unless such person requests a hearing pursuant to section 76-2240. The board may, through the Attorney General, obtain an order from the district court for the enforcement of the cease and desist order.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 20;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 21;

Laws 1994, LB 1107, § 16;

Laws 2001, LB 162, § 12;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 40;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 40;

Laws 2018, LB741, § 26;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 69.